pt-PT: Substrato do letreiro: Película PET retroiluminada; Revestimento magnético; Cartolina; Acrílico transparente com impressão inversa; Película translúcida (poliéster); Autocolante de vinil; Outro
ja: マーキー基材: バックライトPETフィルム; マグネットオーバーレイ; 紙製カードストック; 裏面印刷透明アクリル; トランスライトフィルム（ポリエステル）; ビニールデカール; その他
ro-RO: Substratul siglei: Film PET retroiluminat; Suprapunere magnetică; Carton; Acril transparent imprimat invers; Film translite (poliester); Autocolant vinil; Altele
es: Sustrato de marquesina: Película PET retroiluminada; Revestimiento magnético; Cartulina de papel; Acrílico transparente impreso al reverso; Película translúcida (poliéster); Calcomanía de vinilo; Otros
it: Substrato del marquee: Film PET retroilluminato; Rivestimento magnetico; Cartoncino di carta; Acrilico trasparente con stampa inversa; Film translite (poliestere); Decalcomania in vinile; Altro
nb: Substrat for lysskilt: Bakbelyst PET-film; Magnetisk overlegg; Papirkartong; Baksidetrykt klar akryl; Translite-film (polyester); Vinylklistremerke; Annet
de: Marquee-Substrat: Hintergrundbeleuchtete PET-Folie; Magnetische Auflage; Papierkarton; Rückseitig bedrucktes klares Acryl; Translite-Folie (Polyester); Vinyl-Aufkleber; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Substrat napisa: Osvetljeni PET film; Magnetni prekrivni sloj; Papirni karton; Obratno natisnjen prozoren akril; Prosojni film (poliester); Vinilna nalepka; Drugo
vi: Chất nền biển hiệu: Phim PET có đèn nền; Lớp phủ từ tính; Giấy bìa cứng; Acrylic trong in ngược; Phim polyester translite; Decal vinyl; Khác
cs: Substrát reklamního panelu: Podsvícená PET fólie; Magnetický překryv; Papírový karton; Průhledný akrylát s reverzním tiskem; Translit film (polyester); Vinylová samolepka; Jiné
zh-CN: 标志牌基材: 背光 PET 薄膜; 磁性覆层; 纸质卡纸; 反向印刷透明亚克力; 透光片（聚酯）; 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
pt-BR: Substrato do letreiro: Filme PET retroiluminado; Sobreposição magnética; Papel cartão; Acrílico transparente com impressão reversa; Filme translúcido (poliéster); Adesivo de vinil; Outro
bg-BG: Субстрат на надписа: Фоново осветен PET филм; Магнитно покритие; Хартиен картон; Обратно отпечатан прозрачен акрил; Транслитен филм (полиестер); Винилов стикер; Други
fi: Kyltin alusta: Taustavalaistu PET-kalvo; Magneettinen päällyste; Paperikartonki; Käänteispainettu kirkas akryyli; Valomainoskalvo (polyesteri); Vinyyltarra; Muu
th: วัสดุพื้นผิวป้าย: ฟิล์ม PET แบ็คไลท์; แผ่นแม่เหล็กคลุม; กระดาษการ์ดสต็อก; อะคริลิกใสพิมพ์ด้านหลัง; ฟิล์มทรานส์ไลท์ (โพลีเอสเตอร์); สติกเกอร์ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
pl: Materiał markizy: Folia PET z podświetleniem; Nakładka magnetyczna; Papierowy karton; Przezroczysty akryl z nadrukiem odwrotnym; Folia poliestrowa translite; Naklejka winylowa; Inne
el: Υπόστρωμα μαρκίζας: Φωτιζόμενο φιλμ PET; Μαγνητική επικάλυψη; Χαρτόνι; Διαφανές ακρυλικό με ανάστροφη εκτύπωση; Διαφανές φιλμ (πολυεστέρας); Αυτοκόλλητο βινυλίου; Άλλο
ru: Субстрат декоративной стены: Подсвечиваемая ПЭТ-плёнка; Магнитная накладка; Бумажный картон; Акрил с обратной печатью; Транслитная плёнка (полиэстер); Виниловая наклейка; Другой
lt-LT: Švieslentės substratas: Foninio apšvietimo PET plėvelė; Magnetinis sluoksnis; Popierinis kartonas; Atvirkštinis spausdintas skaidrus akrilas; Translito plėvelė (poliesteris); Vinilinė lipdukas; Kita
sv: Skyltsubstrat: Bakgrundsbelyst PET-film; Magnetöverlägg; Papperskartong; Baksidestryckt klar akryl; Translitefilm (polyester); Vinyldekal; Övrigt
sk-SK: Podložka neónového pútača: Podsvietený PET film; Magnetický prekryv; Papierový kartón; Reverzne potlačený číry akryl; Translitový film (polyester); Vinylová nálepka; Iné
da: Reklameskiltunderlag: Baggrundsbelyst PET-film; Magnetisk overlay; Papirkarton; Bagvendt printet klar akryl; Translite-film (polyester); Vinylmærkat; Andet
zh-TW: 招牌基材: 背光 PET 薄膜; 磁性覆蓋層; 紙卡; 反向印刷透明壓克力; 透光膜（聚酯）; 乙烯貼紙; 其他
ko: 간판 기판: 백라이트 PET 필름; 자석 오버레이; 종이 카드스톡; 역인쇄 투명 아크릴; 트랜스라이트 필름 (폴리에스터); 비닐 데칼; 기타
en: Marquee substrate: Backlit PET film; Magnetic overlay; Paper cardstock; Reverse-printed clear acrylic; Translite film (polyester); Vinyl decal; Other
nl: Reclamebord substraat: Verlichte PET-folie; Magnetische overlay; Papieren karton; Omgekeerd bedrukt helder acryl; Translite folie (polyester); Vinyl sticker; Andere
tr: Başlık altlığı: Arkadan aydınlatmalı PET film; Manyetik kaplama; Kağıt karton; Ters baskılı şeffaf akrilik; Translite film (polyester); Vinil çıkartma; Diğer
fr: Substrat du bandeau défilant: Film PET rétroéclairé; Revêtement magnétique; Carton papier; Acrylique transparent imprimé au verso; Film translucide (polyester); Décalcomanie vinyle; Autre
hu: Feliratpanel (marquee) hordozója: Háttérvilágítású PET fólia; Mágneses fedőréteg; Papír karton; Fordított nyomtatású átlátszó akril; Translite fólia (poliészter); Vinil matrica; Egyéb
hr-HR: Podloga natpisa: PET film s pozadinskim osvjetljenjem; Magnetski premaz; Papirni karton; Prozirni akril tiskan s poleđine; Translitni film (poliester); Vinilna naljepnica; Ostalo